Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-888
Implied warranties of quality.

A declarant and any person in the business of selling real estate for his or her own account warrants that a unit will be in at least as good condition at the earlier of the time of the conveyance or delivery of possession as it was at the time of contracting, reasonable wear and tear excepted.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 64;

Laws 1984, LB 1105, § 20.